Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.040

Additional powers of board.

The board shall, in addition to other powers herein granted, have power:

(1) To compel witnesses to attend and testify before it upon all matters connected with the administration of this chapter, in the same manner as provided by law for the taking of testimony in courts of record in this state, and its president or any member of the board may administer oaths to such witnesses.

(2) To provide for the payment from the fund of all necessary expenses and printing.

No compensation or emolument shall be paid to any member of the board for any duty required or performed under this chapter.

Each board may make all needful rules and regulations for its guidance in the administration of and in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1955 c 69 s 2; 1909 c 39 s 12; RRS s 9590.]